District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

5-1140

Construction of chapter.

Repealed.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-158, § 11, 27 DCR 5127
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 803(a), 42 DCR 3684

History

1981 Ed., § 4-910.

Prior Codifications

Section 12 of D.C. Law 3-158 provided that: “This chapter shall take effect after a 30-day period of Congressional review following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor action by the Council of the District of Columbia to override the veto as provided in § 1-233(c)(1)): Provided, that this chapter shall not take effect prior to October 1, 1981, at which time complaints may be made to the Board.”.
For effective date of repeal of §§ 5-1131 to 5-1140, see Historical and Statutory Notes following § 5-1131.

Effective Dates